Utah statutes.
7-3-19.   Limitations on loans and extensions of credit.
(1) The total loans and extensions of credit by any bank to any person
outstanding at one time and not fully secured, as determined in a manner
consistent with Subsection (2), by collateral having a market value at least
equal to the amount of the loan or extension of credit may not exceed 15% of
the amount of the bank's total capital.
(2) (a)  The total loans and extensions of credit by a bank to a person
outstanding at one time and fully secured by readily marketable collateral
having a market value, as determined by reliable and continuously available
price quotations, at least equal to the amount of the funds outstanding may
not exceed 10% of the total capital of the bank.
(b)  The limitation of Subsection (2)(a) is separate from and in addition to
the limitation described in Subsection (1).
(3) (a)  The limitations contained in Subsections (1) and (2) are subject to
exceptions the commissioner may prescribe by rule.
(b)  A rule made under this section may not be inconsistent with law and
regulations applicable to loan restrictions on national banks.
(4) (a)  The commissioner may, by rule, define the terms "loans and extensions
of credit" and "person" as used in this section.
(b)  The definitions described under Subsection (4)(a) may not be inconsistent
with those applicable to national banks.
